North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-03 Powers, Management, and Operation of Banks
6-03-59.2.
Lease financing of public facilities.

A state-chartered bank may purchase or construct a municipal building, school building, or other similar public facility and, as holder of legal title, lease the facility to a municipality or other public authority having resources sufficient to make all rental payments as they become due. The lease agreement must provide that the lessee will become the owner of the building or facility upon the expiration of the lease. All leases provided in accordance with this section must be subject to the bank’s legal lending limit.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 77, § 18.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

6-03-60.
Loans to and purchases from directors, executive officers, and principal shareholders — Restrictions — Conditions — Penalty — Civil liability.

At no time may any combination of loans or extensions of credit or both made by a state banking association to an officer of that association exceed the limitation on loans to one person or concern specified in section 6-03-59, federal law, or federal rule.

No director, officer, or employee of a bank shall sell to such bank, directly or indirectly, any mortgage, bond, note, stock, or other property whatsoever without first obtaining the written approval of the board of directors. The action of the board of directors in connection with the loans and discounts required under this section shall be made a matter of permanent record in the minute books of the banking association. Any shareholder, officer, or director of any banking association who knowingly shall violate the provisions of this section shall be held liable in the person’s personal and individual capacity for all loss or damage which the association or any person shall sustain in consequence thereof and shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor. The commissioner may require, at any time, the payment or repurchase of loans, securities, or obligations herein referred to.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 53, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 5192; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 36; R.C. 1943, § 6-0360; S.L. 1969, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 70, § 1; 1979, ch. 127, § 1; 1981, ch. 111, § 1; 1983, ch. 111, § 1; 1995, ch. 85, § 3.

Cross-References.

Assessment of civil money penalties, see § 6-01-04.3.

6-03-61.
Excessive loan — Validity — Penalty — Personal liability.

Whenever a state banking association allows any person, copartnership, or corporation to become indebted to it, directly or indirectly, in excess of the amount, exclusive of interest, permitted by this title, the officer, director, or employee thereof willfully permitting or approving such loan is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, and in addition thereto, is liable personally to the association for the amount of such loan in excess of the statutory limit. Unauthorized loans, however, are not invalid.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 643, 644; R.C. 1895, §§ 7518, 7518; S.L. 1897, ch. 32, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 7518, 7519; R.C. 1905, §§ 9277, 9278; S.L. 1911, ch. 53; C.L. 1913, §§ 5192, 10006, 10007; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, §§ 37, 38; R.C. 1943, § 6-0361; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 45.

6-03-62.
Interest on loans — Rate.

An association may demand and receive for loans on personal security, or for discounting notes, bills, or other evidences of debt, such rate of interest as may be agreed upon, not exceeding the amount authorized by law to be contracted for, and it may receive such interest according to the ordinary usage of banking associations and for not more than one year in advance.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 16; 1893, ch. 27, § 16; R.C. 1895, § 3241; R.C. 1899, § 3241; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 17; R.C. 1905, § 4651; C.L. 1913, § 5166; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 39; R.C. 1943, § 6-0362.

Cross-References.

Interest on loans may be deducted in advance — limitation, see § 47-14-08.

6-03-63.
Interest on deposits — Rates payable — Penalty.

No state banking association may pay interest on deposits, directly or indirectly, at rates greater than authorized by the state banking board. The board’s authorization of interest rates is not subject to the public notice and public hearing requirements of chapter 28-32. Any officer, director, or employee of any association violating the provisions of this section, directly or indirectly, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 40; R.C. 1943, § 6-0363; S.L. 1975, ch. 71, § 1; 1981, ch. 106, § 2; 1991, ch. 81, § 6.

6-03-64.
Payment of deposits made by fiduciaries, officers, minors, and associations.

Deposits made by a person as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or in any other representative capacity or official position, with a bank, are payable to that person in such capacity, or if made to an account upon which a minor may order payments as an account owner, may be paid to the minor although the minor has no guardian or conservator or if the minor has a guardian or conservator, it is not necessary to obtain the consent of the guardian or conservator to such payment, but a payment order or receipt or acquittance authorized by the minor is valid and binding. Deposits made by a corporation, association, or society are payable to any person authorized by its board of directors or trustees to receive the same.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 56, § 8; C.L. 1913, § 5200; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 42; R.C. 1043, § 6-0364; S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 2; 2009, ch. 98, § 1.

6-03-65.
Deposit in trust — To whom paid.

Whenever any deposit is made with any banking association by any person in trust for another and no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust has been given in writing to the bank, in the event of the death of the trustee, the deposit, or any part thereof, together with the dividends or interest thereon, may be paid to the person for whom the deposit was made.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 111, § 1; 1925, Supp., § 5220a3; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 43; R.C. 1943, § 6-0365.

6-03-66.
Deposit in two or more names — To whom paid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

6-03-67.
Appropriation of deposits unlawful — Exception — Liability therefor.

Except as provided in sections 6-07.2-09 and 30.1-31-20, it is unlawful for any banking association to charge any claim which it might have, or the claim of any other person, against a deposit made with the association, or to appropriate a deposit or any part of the deposit to the payment of any debt to the association, without legal process or the consent of the depositor. Any banking association that violates this section is liable to the party aggrieved for any damages caused by the violation.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 139, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 5220a1, 5220a2; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 41, subs. a, b; R.C. 1943, § 6-0367; S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 3; 1987, ch. 108, § 1; 1991, ch. 351, § 1; 2021, ch. 77, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

6-03-67.1.
Operation without federal deposit insurance prohibited — Liability — Penalty.

No state banking association shall, after July 1, 1978, engage in the business of banking without securing and continuing in force federal deposit insurance corporation insurance of deposits. Any officer or director of any state banking association who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be personally liable to any person aggrieved for any damages caused by the violation.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 67, § 4.

Cross-References.

Proof of federal deposit insurance required before certificate of authority will be delivered, see § 6-02-03.

6-03-68.
Collection of negotiable instruments by bank — Liability for negligence. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 296, § 32.

6-03-68.1.
Settlement of check presented by or through federal reserve bank or Bank of North Dakota.

Except as to any check sent to it as a special collection item, no bank may settle any check drawn on it otherwise than at par when such check is presented by or through a federal reserve bank or the Bank of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 114, § 1.

6-03-69.
Report of examining committee.

The board of directors shall submit to the commissioner a report of the examining committee on forms provided by the commissioner. The report must reflect the results of a careful and thorough examination of the assets of the bank, including loans and discounts of every nature and the securities and collaterals belonging to the bank. The valuation of the assets of the bank must be compared with the records of the bank. The report must be made a part of the minutes of a regular meeting of the board of directors. The commissioner may refuse to accept the report if found to be not in accordance with acceptable accounting principles.

Any of the following methods may be used to conduct the examination required by this section:

Examination by the board of directors or its examining committee. When this method is employed, the examination must be conducted and the report submitted in July of each year.

Examination on an annual basis by an independent certified public accountant or firms composed of such accountants, or auditors of the bank’s holding company, if any.

Examination by an autonomous internal audit control system. The individual directing the internal audit control system shall submit to the board of directors each quarter an interim report as to the degree of compliance with the internal audit control system and shall express an opinion as to the adequacy of the internal controls. A complete report must be submitted annually to the board of directors.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 27, § 32; R.C. 1895, § 3257; R.C. 1899, § 3257; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 33; R.C. 1905, § 4667; C.L. 1913, § 5182; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 27; R.C. 1943, § 6-0369; S.L. 1981, ch. 112, § 1; 1989, ch. 98, § 2; 1997, ch. 78, § 8.

6-03-70.
Reports — Regular and special — Publication — Penalty.

Every state banking association shall respond to calls each year, the number to be determined by the commissioner. The commissioner shall prescribe the forms for such reports which must be the same forms as those for similar reports called by the federal deposit insurance corporation. The reports must exhibit in detail, under appropriate headings, the resources and liabilities of the association at the close of business on a past day specified by the commissioner, which must be the same day on which similar reports are required by the federal deposit insurance corporation. Each report must be verified by the oath of the president or the cashier and attested as correct by at least two of the directors and must be transmitted to the commissioner within thirty days after receipt of the request for the same. The commissioner may request an amended call for reports filed in error and may require republication of the call report containing material errors. At the discretion of the commissioner, a call may be complied with by submission of a photocopy of the call report submitted to the federal deposit insurance corporation or federal reserve bank or a printout retrieved from computer facilities in the department of financial institutions and connected to those of the federal deposit insurance corporation. The commissioner may call for a special report from any association whenever in the commissioner’s judgment the same is necessary to obtain complete knowledge of the condition of the association. Every association which fails to make and transmit any report required by this section shall forfeit and pay to the state treasurer for deposit in the financial institutions regulatory fund a penalty of two hundred dollars for each delinquency. The commissioner may waive the penalty for reports filed late, not exceeding three business days beyond the due date required by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 17; 1893, ch. 27, § 17; R.C. 1895, § 3242; S.L. 1897, ch. 31; R.C. 1899, § 3242; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 18; R.C. 1905, § 4652; C.L. 1913, § 5167; S.L. 1925, ch. 94, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5167; S.L. 1927, ch. 94, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 28; R.C. 1943, § 6-0370; S.L. 1979, ch. 128, § 1; 1981, ch. 113, § 1; 1987, ch. 109, § 1; 1989, ch. 96, § 5; 1995, ch. 86, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 14.

Cross-References.

Assessment of civil money penalties, see § 6-01-04.3.

6-03-71.
Bonds of officers and employees.

All officers and employees of any state banking association, before entering upon their duties, shall furnish a bond to the association in the sum and upon the conditions as required by the board of directors in keeping with rules established by the state banking board. All bonds must be approved by the board of directors of the association and are subject to the approval of the commissioner. A record of the approval of the bonds by the board of directors of the association must be made on the records of the bank, and the bonds must be filed with the commissioner. Stockholders of the banks are not eligible as bondsmen for the officers.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 27, § 31; R.C. 1895, § 3256; S.L. 1897, ch. 31; R.C. 1899, § 3256; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 32; R.C. 1905, § 4666; C.L. 1913, § 5181; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 29, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 6-0371; 1997, ch. 78, § 9.

6-03-72.
Certification of checks, drafts, and orders — Penalty.

It is unlawful for an officer, clerk, or agent of any state banking association to certify any check, draft, or order drawn upon the association unless the person drawing the same has on deposit with the association at the time of such certification an amount of money equal to the amount specified therein, and upon such certification, the amount of such certified check, draft, or order must be immediately charged against the account of such drawer. Any officer or employee of any banking association who willfully violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 60; R.C. 1943, § 6-0372; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 46.

6-03-73.
Deferred posting authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 296, § 32.

6-03-74.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 296, § 32.

6-03-75.
Varied by agreement. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

6-03-76.
Records search reimbursement. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Any financial institution authorized to do business in this state must be reimbursed as follows for all records searches done at the request of any state agency or any branch of the state government except the department of human services. Further, any federal agency or any branch of the federal government must also make such reimbursement if authorized to do so:

For search and processing time at the rate of thirty dollars per hour per person, computed on the basis of seven dollars and fifty cents per quarter hour, limited to the total amount of personnel time spent in locating, retrieving, reproducing, packaging, and preparing for shipment documents or information requested.

For making copies of duplicates of required or requested documents at the rate of fifteen cents per page.

For making copies of photographs, films, and other materials at the actual cost incurred by the financial institution.

The financial institution must be reimbursed for all actual mailing or transportation expenses incurred in conveying the requested or required materials to the requesting agency. The reimbursement provisions of this section shall not apply to standard confirmations.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 84, § 1.

6-03-76.
Records search reimbursement. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Any financial institution authorized to do business in this state must be reimbursed as follows for all records searches done at the request of any state agency or any branch of the state government except the department of health and human services. Further, any federal agency or any branch of the federal government must also make such reimbursement if authorized to do so:

For search and processing time at the rate of thirty dollars per hour per person, computed on the basis of seven dollars and fifty cents per quarter hour, limited to the total amount of personnel time spent in locating, retrieving, reproducing, packaging, and preparing for shipment documents or information requested.

For making copies of duplicates of required or requested documents at the rate of fifteen cents per page.

For making copies of photographs, films, and other materials at the actual cost incurred by the financial institution.

The financial institution must be reimbursed for all actual mailing or transportation expenses incurred in conveying the requested or required materials to the requesting agency. The reimbursement provisions of this section shall not apply to standard confirmations.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 84, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 3, effective September 1, 2022.